Utah statutes.
63M-7-509.   Grounds for eligibility.

In order to be eligible for a reparations award under this chapter:

(1)  The claimant shall be:

(a)  a victim of criminally injurious conduct;

(b)  a dependent of a deceased victim of criminally injurious conduct; or

(c)  a representative acting on behalf of one of the above.

(2) (a)  The criminally injurious conduct shall have occurred in Utah, except as provided in Subsection (2)(b).

(b)  If a Utah resident suffers injury or death as a result of criminally injurious conduct inflicted in a state, territory, or country which does not provide a crime victims' compensation program, that person shall receive the same consideration under this chapter as if the criminally injurious conduct occurred in this state.

(3)  The application shall be made in writing in a form that conforms substantially to that prescribed by the board.

(4)  The criminally injurious conduct shall be reported to a law enforcement officer, in the law enforcement officer's capacity as a law enforcement officer, or other federal or state investigative agencies.

(5) (a)  The claimant or victim shall cooperate with the appropriate law enforcement agencies and prosecuting attorneys in their efforts to apprehend or convict the perpetrator of the alleged offense.

(b)  An award to a victim may be made whether any person is arrested, prosecuted, or convicted of the criminally injurious conduct giving rise to the claim.

(6)  The criminally injurious conduct shall have occurred after December 31, 1986.

